Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.125

Capitol buildings and grounds—Custody and control.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

(1) The director of enterprise services shall have custody and control of the capitol buildings and grounds, supervise and direct proper care, heating, lighting and repairing thereof, and designate rooms in the capitol buildings to be occupied by various state officials.

(2) During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the director must give legislative members reasonable access to reserve and utilize the reception room in the state legislative building when not otherwise booked.

[ 2024 c 375 s 8010; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 204; 2007 c 520 s 6014; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.125. Prior: 1959 c 301 s 2; 1955 c 285 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 375: See note following RCW 70A.65.305.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Part headings not law—2007 c 520: "Part headings in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2007 c 520 s 6055.]

Severability—2007 c 520: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 520 s 6056.]

Effective dates—2007 c 520: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 15, 2007], except for section 6035 of this act which takes effect July 1, 2007, and section 6037 of this act which takes effect June 30, 2011." [ 2007 c 520 s 6057.]

Capitol campus design advisory committee: RCW 43.34.080.

East capitol site, acquisition and development: RCW 79.24.500 through 79.24.600.

Housing for state offices: Chapter 43.82 RCW.

Parking facilities and traffic on capitol grounds: RCW 79.24.300 through 79.24.320, 46.08.150.

Public buildings, earthquake standards for construction: Chapter 70.86 RCW.